Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 2 Railroad, Steamboat, and Bridge Police

12-2-1.
Commissioning of special police — Revocation of commission.

The governor may from time to time, upon the application of any common carrier of passengers, or of the director of transportation, commission for an indefinite term one or more persons designated by that common carrier or the director of transportation who, having been duly sworn, may act at its expense as police officers upon the premises used by it in its business and upon its cars, vessels, and bridges. The commission may be revoked by and at the pleasure of the appointing or any succeeding governor, by certifying the revocation to the secretary of state, who shall notify the common carrier or the director of transportation upon whose application the commission was issued.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 107, § 1; P.L. 1902, ch. 972, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1119; P.L. 1908, ch. 1555, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 128, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 134, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 615, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2847, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-2-1

.

12-2-2.
Badges to be worn or carried by officers.

Every officer commissioned under this chapter shall, when on duty and in uniform, wear in plain sight a metallic badge inscribed with the words “railroad police” and the name or initials of the corporation for which he or she is appointed, or “steamboat police” according to his or her appointment. When not in uniform, the officer must carry a badge while on duty.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 107, § 4; G.L., ch. 107, § 2; P.L. 1902, ch. 972, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 128, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 134, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 615, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-2-2

; P.L. 1987, ch. 88, § 1.

12-2-3.
Power to preserve order.

Railroad police officers may:

Preserve order within and upon the premises and cars of the corporation upon whose petition they were appointed;

Arrest without a warrant intoxicated or disorderly persons frequenting the premises or cars and by their presence or conduct, or by profane or indecent language obstructing or annoying travelers using them; and

Take the persons to the nearest police station or other place of lawful detention.

In addition to these powers, railroad police officers shall possess and exercise any other powers to arrest without a warrant on the premises, cars, vehicles, or any property in the custody or control of the corporations or companies and upon streets, highways, and lands immediately abutting the property or premises, that are conferred on police officers of the cities and towns of the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 107, § 5; G.L., ch. 167, § 3; P.L. 1902, ch. 972, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 128, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 134, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 615, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

12-2-3

; P.L. 1972, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 88, § 1.

12-2-4.
Arrest and detention of disorderly persons and persons refusing to pay.

If a passenger upon a railroad train refuses to pay his or her fare, or is noisy or disorderly, a railroad police officer may arrest him or her without a warrant, and remove him or her to the baggage or other suitable car of the train and confine him or her there until the arrival of the train at some station where the passenger can be placed in the charge of an officer, who shall take him or her to some place of lawful detention.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 107, § 6; G.L. 1896, ch. 107, § 4; P.L. 1902, ch. 972, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 128, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 134, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 615, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

12-2-4

.

12-2-5.
Powers of steamboat police.

Steamboat police officers shall have similar powers upon the vessels and boats of the carriers upon whose petition they were appointed, and upon the premises and at the wharves and landing places owned or used by the carrier, to those given by §§

12-2-3

and

12-2-4

to railroad police officers.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 107, § 7; G.L. 1896, ch. 107, § 5; P.L. 1902, ch. 972, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 128, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 134, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 615, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

12-2-5

.

12-2-6.
Detention of persons arrested without warrant — Jurisdiction of offenses — Penalty.

Any person arrested without a warrant under the provisions of §§

12-2-3

—

12-2-5

may be detained until a complaint can be made against him or her, and he or she is taken upon a warrant issued upon the complaint; provided, that arrest and detention without a warrant shall not continue longer than the space of six (6) hours when the arrest is made between the hours of four o’clock (4:00) in the morning and eight o’clock (8:00) in the evening, and when made at any other hours the person arrested shall not be so detained after ten o’clock (10:00) in the morning of the following day. The district court for the division in which the person is detained shall have jurisdiction of the offenses specified in §§

12-2-3

—

12-2-5

, and any person found guilty of those offenses shall be fined not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 107, § 8; G.L., ch. 107, § 6; as enacted by P.L. 1902, ch. 972, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 128, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 134, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 615, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

12-2-6

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 13.

12-2-7.
Payment of officers — Liability for misconduct.

Railroad and steamboat police officers shall be paid by the corporation or carrier upon whose petition they were appointed, and the corporation or carrier shall be liable to parties for any official misconduct of the officers to the same extent as for torts of agents and servants in their employment, but no town or city shall be responsible for the acts of the officers.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 107, § 9; G.L. 1896, ch. 107, § 7; P.L. 1902, ch. 972, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 128, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 134, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 615, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

12-2-7

.

12-2-8.
Bridge police included in chapter.

Whenever in this chapter, there appear the words “railroad police,” “steamboat police,” and/or “railroad and/or steamboat police,”, they are deemed to include “bridge police”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2847, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-2-8

; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 22.